Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,159
Local housing agency; joint exercise of powers authorized.

In addition to the cooperative action by public agencies through the formation and operation of regional housing agencies authorized under sections 71-1581 to 71-1587, any power, privilege, or authority exercised or capable of being exercised by a local housing agency of this state may be exercised and enjoyed jointly with any other housing agency or other public agency of this state having such power, privilege, or authority and jointly with any public agency of any other state or of the United States to the extent that the laws of such other state or of the United States permit such joint exercise or enjoyment.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 88.